Illinois, session 104th, HB2326.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Fairness in Lending Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 120/1)  (from Ch. 17, par. 851)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Illinois Fairness in Lending Act".9(Source: P.A. 81-1391.)